Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5.10 of Title 76, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person, regardless of official capacity or lack of


official capacity, who witnesses an act of violent crime being


committed against another person shall not be subject to prosecution


for reasonable actions taken to defend the person upon whom the


violent crime is being committed. Reasonable actions shall include


actions taken to stop the violent crime from being committed and any


actions necessary to ensure the safety of the victim until law


enforcement arrives.


B. “Violent crime” shall mean the same as defined by Section


571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 1558 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1558 TEK 1/16/2025 3:34:45 PM











































Req. No. 1558 Page 2